tests/runtime/repeat.sbl
// Test `repeat`.

stringescapes { }

externals ( stem )

define stem as (
  ='ok'

  $(limit==size) or fail='limit not size by default'

  // Regression tests for Ada `repeat` codegen bug.
  // https://github.com/snowballstem/snowball/issues/275
  setlimit tomark cursor+1 for repeat 'Q'  $(limit==size) or fail='limit not restored after repeat'
  setlimit next for repeat 'Q'  $(limit==size) or fail='limit not restored after repeat (2)'
)
